New Jersey, session 222, S3916.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The State criteria for determining whether a student has a specific learning disability under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. s.1400 et seq., shall: (1)   permit the use of a process based on the students response to scientific, research-based intervention; (2)   permit the use of other alternative research-based procedures; and (3)   effective in the fourth full school year following the date of enactment of this act, prohibit the use of a severe discrepancy between intellectual ability and achievement for determining whether a student has a specific learning disability. b.    With respect to determining whether a student has a specific learning disability pursuant to subsection a. of this section, a board of education shall not use any single procedure as the sole criterion for determining whether a student has a specific learning disability or for determining an appropriate educational program for the student. c.     With respect to determining whether a student has a specific learning disability pursuant to subsection a. of this section, a board of education shall ensure that the evaluation is sufficiently comprehensive and, at a minimum, includes an assessment of basic psychological processes to identify all of the students special education and related services needs given the most current evidence-based research and practice available when making the determination. d.  The State Board of Education shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.  The regulations shall permit the use of methodologies for determining whether a student has a specific learning disability that are consistent with the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.